Utah statutes.
53A-1a-501.6.   Power and duties of State Charter School Board.

(1)  The State Charter School Board shall:

(a)  authorize and promote the establishment of charter schools, subject to the provisions in this part;

(b)  annually review and evaluate the performance of charter schools authorized by the State Charter School Board and hold the schools accountable for their performance;

(c)  monitor charter schools authorized by the State Charter School Board for compliance with federal and state laws, rules, and regulations;

(d)  provide technical support to charter schools and persons seeking to establish charter schools by:

(i)  identifying and promoting successful charter school models;

(ii)  facilitating the application and approval process for charter school authorization;

(iii)  directing charter schools and persons seeking to establish charter schools to sources of private funding and support;

(iv)  reviewing and evaluating proposals to establish charter schools for the purpose of supporting and strengthening proposals before an application for charter school authorization is submitted to a chartering entity; and

(v)  assisting charter schools to understand and carry out their charter obligations;

(e)  provide technical support, as requested, to a chartering entity relating to charter schools;

(f)  make recommendations on legislation and rules pertaining to charter schools to the Legislature and State Board of Education, respectively; and

(g)  make recommendations to the State Board of Education on the funding of charter schools.

(2)  The State Charter School Board may:

(a)  contract;

(b)  sue and be sued; and

(c) (i)  at the discretion of the charter school, provide administrative services to, or perform other school functions for, charter schools authorized by the State Charter School Board; and

(ii)  charge fees for the provision of services or functions.

